Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201458-812
Property, defined.

Property means the real estate upon which a project is
or will be located, including equipment, machinery, and other similar items
necessary or convenient for the operation of the project in the manner for
which its use is intended, but not including such items as fuel, supplies,
or other items that are customarily deemed to result in a current operation
charge. Property does not include any property
used or to be used primarily for sectarian instruction or study or as a place
for devotional activities or religious worship nor any property which is used
or to be used primarily in connection with any part of the program of a school
or department of divinity for any religious denomination or the training of
ministers, priests, rabbis, or other professional persons in the field of
religion.

Laws 1981, LB 321, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2906;

Laws 1995, LB 5, § 9;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 85-1709;

Laws 2013, LB170, § 12.